Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1065
Examinations; requirements; grades.

(1) Examinations approved by the board may be national standardized examinations, but in all cases the examinations shall be related to the knowledge and skills necessary to perform the practices being examined and shall be related to the curricula required to be taught in schools of cosmetology, schools of esthetics, or schools of electrolysis.

(2) Practical examinations may be offered as either written or hands-on and shall be conducted in such a manner that the identity of the applicant is not disclosed to the examiners in any way.

(3) In order to successfully complete the examination, an applicant shall obtain an average grade of seventy-five percent on all examinations.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 51;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 24;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 134;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-390;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 366;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 327;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 18.